Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. Library Assistance Grants.

Sec. 14.56.300.
Library assistance grant program.

There is established in the department a library assistance grant program. From legislative appropriations, the department shall make grants to eligible libraries for public library operations, for interlibrary cooperation, or for regional library services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 124 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 2008)

Administrative Code. —

For library assistance grants, see 4 AAC 57, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2008 amendment, effective September 2, 2008, substituted “program” for “fund” in the first sentence, and deleted “to the fund” following “appropriations” in the second sentence.

Sec. 14.56.310.
Eligibility.

Libraries eligible for grants under AS

14.56.300

are

public libraries established under AS

14.56.400

or, in a municipality that does not have a public library established under AS

14.56.400

, another library that

is a nonprofit corporation and holds meetings of its board of directors in public;

provides services listed in AS

14.56.400(a)

; and

is approved to receive grants under AS

14.56.300

by resolution of the governing body of that municipality;

libraries sharing resources free of charge with other libraries in the state; and

libraries providing regional library services.

A library described in (a)(1) of this section is eligible for a public library assistance grant. A library described in (a)(2) of this section is eligible for an interlibrary cooperation assistance grant. A library described in (a)(3) of this section is eligible for a regional library services assistance grant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1981; am § 2 ch 124 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1998, “AS

14.56.400

” was substituted for “AS

29.35.125

” in all three occurrences in subsection (a) in order to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that section.

Administrative Code. —

For library assistance grants, see 4 AAC 57, art. 2.

Sec. 14.56.320.
Applications.

An eligible library may apply to the department for a grant under AS

14.56.300

—

14.56.340

in accordance with regulations adopted by the board.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1981)

Sec. 14.56.330.
Limitations.

A public library assistance grant under AS

14.56.310(a)(1)

may be a basic grant or a per capita grant. A basic grant may not be more than $7,000 for each service outlet of the public library in any one fiscal year. The amount of a basic grant must be equally matched by local money, the fair value of volunteer labor, or a combination of local money and volunteer labor. If the amount available for public library assistance grants during a fiscal year is not sufficient to fully fund basic grants for all eligible libraries, the amount available shall be prorated so that the amount of basic grants for all eligible libraries is reduced by the same percentage. After payment of basic grants to all eligible libraries during a fiscal year, any amount remaining for public library assistance grants shall be distributed as per capita grants to each library that received a basic grant. The amount of the per capita grants shall be based on the population of the municipality or unincorporated community served by each of the libraries.

State money granted to a library under AS

14.56.300

—

14.56.340

may not be used to supplant local money equal to local expenditures for that library in fiscal year 1980, as adjusted annually by the commissioner to conform approximately to changes in the United States Department of Labor Bureau of Labor Statistics consumer price index for Anchorage, Alaska. A library that uses state money to supplant local money forfeits eligibility for grants under AS

14.56.300

—

14.56.340

for two years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1981; am § 3 ch 124 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For library assistance grants, see 4 AAC 57, art. 2.

Sec. 14.56.340.
Regulations.

The board shall adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

14.56.300

—

14.56.330

. The regulations must include qualifications for grant eligibility and provisions regarding the use of grant funds.

History.

(§ 1 ch 36 SLA 1981; am § 4 ch 124 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For planning and reports, see 4 AAC 57, art. 1.

For library assistance grants, see 4 AAC 57, art. 2.

Sec. 14.56.350.
Public library construction grants. [Repealed, § 6 ch 124 SLA 1998.]